Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2223.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 12-601, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE12-601. Application; venue; judgment; sealing of record A. A person who desires to change the person's name and to adopt another name may file an application in the superior court in the county of the person's residence, setting forth reasons for the change of name and the name the person wishes to adopt. The court may enter judgment that the adopted name of the party be substituted for the original name.  The court shall consider the criteria under subsection C of this section in determining whether to enter judgment that the adopted name of the party be substituted for the original name. B. The parent, guardian ad litem or next friend of a minor may file an application for change of the name of the minor in the county of the minor's residence. The court shall consider the best interests of the minor and the criteria that apply to the minor under subsection C of this section in determining whether to enter judgment that the name of the minor be changed. C. A person who files an application for change of name shall indicate under penalty of perjury: 1. If the person has been convicted of a felony. 2. If felony charges are pending in any jurisdiction against the person for any offense under title 13, chapter 18, 20, 21, 22, 23 or 27 or any other offense involving false statements or misrepresentations about the person's identity. 3. If the person is knowingly changing the person's name to that of another individual for the purpose of committing or furthering the commission of any offense under title 13, chapter 18, 20, 21, 22, 23 or 27 or any other offense involving false statements. 4. The person is making the application solely for the best interest of the person. 5. The person acknowledges that the change of name will not release the person from any obligations incurred or harm any rights of property or actions in the original name. 6. If the person has been convicted in any state of an offense for which the person is required to register as a sex offender. 7. If the person has served a copy of the application with the prosecuting agency of the county in which the person was convicted pursuant to subsection D of this section. D. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a victim as defined in section 13-4401 or a prosecutor has standing to contest any legal name change at any time before the entry of judgment or up to one year after entry of judgment. If the person who files an application for change of name was convicted in this state, the person shall serve a copy of the application with the prosecuting agency of the county in which the person was convicted.  If the victim has requested postconviction notice, the prosecuting agency of the county in which the person was convicted shall notify the victim of the application for change of name and the victim's right to contest the name change.  If the person who files an application for change of name was convicted in another state, the person shall serve a copy of the application with the prosecuting agency in the jurisdiction in which the person was convicted and the County Attorney in the County in which the person filed the application. E. On entering a conviction for an offense under title 13, chapter 18, 20, 21, 22, 23 or 27 or any other offense involving false statements or misrepresentations about the person's identity, the superior court may enter an order setting aside a change of name judgment or deny any pending application. F. On request of a person who files an application for a change of name, the court may seal the change of name application and judgment.  The information in the application and judgment shall not be disclosed and is not a public record.  A person who obtained a judgment on or after January 1, 2009 may request that the court seal the application and judgment pursuant to this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, "person" means a person who is protected under an order of protection or injunction against harassment or a person who is the victim of an offense involving stalking as prescribed in section 13-2923 or an offense committed in another jurisdiction that if committed in this state would be a violation or attempted violation of section 13-2923. G. If the court grants an application for a change of name for a person who is required to register pursuant to section 13-3821, the court shall order the person to register under the person's new name and to use the person's prior name as an alias.  a copy of the order shall be provided to the sheriff of the county in which the person CURRENTLY resides. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 7, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 7, 2026.